Alaska statutes. Title 23. Labor and Workers’ Compensation.
Article 9. General Provisions.

Sec. 23.20.475.
Amendment or repeal.

There may be no vested right of any kind against the state as the result of enactment, amendment, or repeal of this chapter.

History.

(§ 1002 ch 5 ESLA 1955)

Sec. 23.20.480.
Termination.

If the Federal Unemployment Tax Act is amended or repealed by Congress, or is held unconstitutional by the United States Supreme Court, with the result that no portion of the contributions required under this chapter may be credited against the tax imposed by the federal Act, the Department of Labor and Workforce Development shall send immediate notice of the fact to the governor of the state. Because of the danger to the welfare of the people of the state the governor may then call a special session of the legislature, if necessary, so that it may take measures to effectuate the purpose of this chapter or to end its operations.

Pending the determination by the legislature, the department shall requisition from the unemployment trust fund all money in the fund to its credit. This money, together with any other money in the unemployment fund, as long as the money is available, shall be used for the payment of benefits in accordance with this chapter.

History.

(§ 1004 ch 5 ESLA 1955)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in (a) of this section, “Department of Labor” was changed to “Department of Labor and Workforce Development” in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Sec. 23.20.485.
False statement to secure benefits.

A person who makes a false statement or misrepresentation knowing it is false or who knowingly fails to disclose a material fact, with intent to obtain or increase a benefit or other payment under this chapter or under an employment security law of another state, of the federal government, or of a foreign government, either for that person or another, is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.
Each false statement or misrepresentation or failure to disclose a material fact is a separate offense.

History.

(§ 901 ch 5 ESLA 1955; am § 70 ch 9 SLA 1980)

Cross references. —

For fines and sentences for class B misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.035

and

12.55.135

.

Sec. 23.20.486.
Participation in the federal offset program.

In addition to any remedies authorized by this chapter, the department may offset any covered unemployment compensation debt against a claimant’s federal income tax refund in accordance with 26 U.S.C. 6402.

History.

(§ 8 ch 50 SLA 2013)

Effective dates. —

Section 14, ch. 50, SLA 2013 makes this section effective July 1, 2013.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 50, SLA 2013 (HB 76), see 2013 House Journal 70 — 71.

Sec. 23.20.490.
Acts of employer prohibited.

An employing unit or an officer or agent of an employing unit may not

make a false statement or representation knowing it is false;

knowingly fail to disclose a material fact to prevent or reduce the payment of benefits to an individual entitled to them, or to avoid or reduce a contribution or other payment required from an employing unit under this chapter; or

knowingly fail or refuse to make a contribution or other payment, or to furnish a report required by this chapter or by authority granted under this chapter, or to produce or permit the inspection or copying of records as required by this chapter.

An employing unit or officer or agent of an employing unit who violates (a) of this section is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 902 ch 5 ESLA 1955; am § 71 ch 9 SLA 1980)

Cross references. —

For fines and sentences for class A misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.035

and

12.55.135

.

Sec. 23.20.495.
Noncompliance with subpoena of agency.

A person who, without just cause, fails or refuses to attend and testify or to answer a lawful inquiry or to produce books, papers, correspondence, memoranda, and other records, if it is in the person’s power to do so, in obedience to a subpoena of the department, an appeal tribunal, or an authorized representative of any of them, upon conviction, is punishable by a fine of not more than $200, or by imprisonment for not more than 60 days, or by both.
Each day the failure or refusal continues is a separate offense.

History.

(§ 903 ch 5 ESLA 1955)

Sec. 23.20.497.
Binding effect of department decisions.

A finding of fact or law, judgment, conclusion, or final order made with respect to a claim for unemployment compensation under this chapter is not conclusive or binding in any separate or subsequent action or proceeding in another forum concerning proceedings not under this chapter, regardless of whether the prior action was between the same or related parties or involved the same facts.

In this section, “action” means a court or administrative proceeding not brought under this chapter or an arbitration proceeding.

History.

(§ 21 ch 43 SLA 1996; am § 8 ch 130 SLA 2004)

Sec. 23.20.500.
Violation of statute or regulations.

A person who wilfully violates a provision of this chapter or an order or regulation under it, the violation of which is made unlawful or the observance of which is required under this chapter, and for which a penalty is not prescribed in this chapter or provided by another applicable statute, upon conviction, is punishable by a fine of not more than $200, or by imprisonment for not more than 60 days, or by both.

History.

(§ 904 ch 5 ESLA 1955)

Sec. 23.20.505.
Unemployed defined.

An individual is considered “unemployed” in a week during which the individual performs no services and for which no wages are payable to the individual, or in a week of less than full-time work if the wages payable to the individual for the week are less than one and one-third times the individual’s weekly benefit amount, excluding the allowance for dependents, plus $50.

[Repealed, § 33 ch 115 SLA 1982.]

[Repealed, § 33 ch 115 SLA 1982.]

An individual is not considered “unemployed” in a week if

the individual is not performing services during that week because the individual is on leave from the regular employer of the individual for a period of four weeks or less; and

the leave is part of a work schedule consisting of alternating periods of work and leave in which the hours of work for one complete period of work and leave average at least 40 hours per week.

History.

(§ 254 ch 5 ESLA 1955; am § 5 ch 169 SLA 1957; am § 72 ch 9 SLA 1980; am §§ 27, 33 ch 115 SLA 1982; am § 13 ch 106 SLA 1984)

Administrative Code. —

For employment security, see 8 AAC 85.

Sec. 23.20.510.
Pay period.

If the service performed during one-half or more of a pay period by an individual for an employing unit constitutes employment, all the service of the individual for the period is considered employment.

If the service performed during more than one-half of a pay period by an individual for an employing unit does not constitute employment, then none of the service of the individual for the period is considered employment.

In this section, “pay period” means a period of not more than 31 consecutive days for which a payment for service is ordinarily made to the individual by the employing unit. This section does not apply to service performed in a pay period by an individual for an employing unit when any of the service is excluded because it is subject to an unemployment insurance program established by an Act of Congress.

History.

(§ 235 ch 5 ESLA 1955)

Sec. 23.20.515.
Earnings of fishermen not subject to contributions. [Repealed, § 26 ch 122 SLA 1977.]

Sec. 23.20.520.
Definitions.

In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires,

“American vessel” means a vessel documented or numbered under the laws of the United States, or a vessel not documented or numbered under the laws of the United States nor documented under the laws of a foreign country, if its crew performs service solely for one or more citizens or residents of the United States or corporations organized under the laws of the United States or of a state;

“average annual wage” means the amount determined by dividing the total wages paid by covered employers during a 12-month period by the average monthly employment reported by covered employers for the same period;

“base period” means the first four of the last five completed calendar quarters immediately preceding the first day of an individual’s benefit year, except that, if an individual would not otherwise be eligible for unemployment compensation because of the use of a base period that does not include the most recently completed calendar quarter immediately preceding the first day of an individual’s benefit year, “base period” means, and eligibility shall be determined using, the four most recently completed calendar quarters before the start of the benefit year;

“benefit year” means a period of 52 consecutive weeks beginning at 12:00 a.m. of the Sunday preceding the day that an insured worker first files a request for determination of the worker’s insured status, and, thereafter, the period of 52 consecutive weeks beginning at 12:00 a.m. of the Sunday preceding the day that the insured worker next files the request after the end of the worker’s last preceding benefit year; however, for a worker covered by this paragraph, “benefit year” also means a period of 53 weeks if the filing of a request for determination would result in overlapping any quarter of the base year of a previously filed request for determination; the filing of a notice of unemployment is considered a request for determination of insured status if a current benefit year has not previously been established;

“benefits” means the money payments payable to an individual, as provided in this chapter with respect to the individual’s unemployment;

“calendar quarter” means the period of three consecutive calendar months ending March 31, June 30, September 30, or December 31;

“claimant” means an individual who has filed a request for a determination of insured status, a notice of unemployment, a certification for waiting-week credit, or a claim for benefits;

“contribution” and “payment in place of contribution” mean the money payment to be made to the fund, which payments are taxes due to the state;

“covered unemployment compensation debt” means

a past due debt for erroneous payment of unemployment compensation under this chapter because of fraud or the person’s failure to report earnings that has become final under this chapter and that remains uncollected;

contributions due to the unemployment trust fund account (AS

23.20.135(a)

) for which a person is liable and that remain uncollected; and

any penalties and interest assessed on the debt;

“employer” means (A) an employing unit which for some portion of a day within the calendar year has or had in employment one or more individuals; and (B) for the effective period of its election under AS

23.20.325

, an employing unit which has elected to become subject to this chapter;

“employing unit” means one or more departments or other agencies of the state, a political subdivision of the state, a federally recognized tribe, an individual, or a type of organization, partnership, association, trust, estate, joint trust company, insurance company, or domestic or foreign corporation, or the receiver, referee in bankruptcy, trustee, or successor of one of these, or the legal representative of a deceased person, that has or had one or more individuals performing service for it in the state; an individual performing services in the state for an employing unit that maintains two or more separate establishments in the state is considered as employed by a single employing unit for the purposes of this chapter; notwithstanding any provision in this chapter, any employing unit that employs individuals whose services must be covered by the unemployment insurance laws of this state as a condition of approval of the unemployment insurance laws of this state under 26 U.S.C. 3304(a) (Internal Revenue Code of 1954), as amended, will be considered an employer as to those individuals and is subject to contributions on all wages paid or reimbursement payments to cover benefits paid based on services performed, depending on the applicable law;

“employment office” means a free public employment office or branch of one operated by this state or another state or territory as a part of a state-controlled system of public employment offices or by a federal agency or an agency of a foreign government charged with the administration of an unemployment insurance program or of free public employment offices;

“federally recognized tribe”

means a tribe that is recognized by the United States Secretary of the Interior to exist as an Indian tribe under 25 U.S.C. 479a (Federally Recognized Indian Tribe List Act of 1994);

includes any subdivision, subsidiary, or business enterprise wholly owned by a federally recognized tribe;

“fund” means the unemployment compensation fund established by this chapter;

“hospital” means any institution primarily engaged in the treatment of emotional or physical disability which provides, on a regular basis, 24-hour-a-day bed care under the supervision of licensed medical personnel and those components, of other institutions, which are primarily engaged in the treatment of emotional or physical disability and which provide, on a regular basis, 24-hour-a-day bed care under the supervision of licensed medical personnel;

“institution of higher education” means an educational institution that

admits as regular students only individuals having a certificate of graduation from a high school, or the recognized equivalent of a high school graduation certificate;

is legally authorized in the state in which it is located to provide a program of education beyond high school;

provides an educational program for which it awards a bachelor’s or higher degree, or provides a program that is acceptable for full credit toward either degree, a program of postgraduate or postdoctoral studies, or a program of training to prepare students for gainful employment in a recognized occupation; and

is operated by a federally recognized tribe or is a public or other nonprofit institution;

“insured work” means employment for employers;

“insured worker” means an individual who, with respect to a base period, meets the wage and employment requirements of AS

23.20.350

;

“municipal agency” means an agency of a municipality of the state; in this paragraph, “municipality” has the meaning given in AS

29.71.800

;

“state” includes the states of the United States of America, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, and the Virgin Islands;

“vocational training or retraining course” means a course of vocational or technical training or retraining in schools or classes, including field or laboratory work and related remedial or academic instruction, which is conducted as a program designed to prepare individuals for employment in trades, skills, or crafts; the term “vocational training or retraining course” does not include a program of instruction for an individual, including a transfer credit program of instruction given at a community college, which is intended as credit for a degree from an institution of higher education;

“waiting week” means the first week of unemployment for which an individual files a claim during the individual’s benefit year and for which no disqualification is imposed under AS

23.20.360

,

23.20.362

,

23.20.375

, and

23.20.378

—

23.20.387

;

“week” means the period of seven consecutive days which the department may by regulations prescribe.

History.

(§§ 202 — 204 ch 5 ESLA 1955; § 205 ch 5 ESLA 1955; §§ 206, 208, 210, 212, 213, 236 — 238, 240, 241, 252, 253 ch 5 ESLA 1955; am § 1 ch 169 SLA 1957; § 13 ch 64 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 93 SLA 1960; am §§ 10 — 13 ch 106 SLA 1971; am § 24 ch 208 SLA 1975; am § 2 ch 74 SLA 1976; am §§ 13, 14 ch 122 SLA 1977; am §§ 73, 74, 77, 80 ch 9 SLA 1980; am §§ 28, 29 ch 115 SLA 1982; am §§ 29 — 31 ch 21 SLA 1985; am § 16 ch 61 SLA 1995; am § 22 ch 43 SLA 1996; am § 6 ch 51 SLA 2000; am § 9 ch 130 SLA 2004; am §§ 13 — 16 ch 27 SLA 2009; am § 9 ch 50 SLA 2013; am § 19 ch 3 SLA 2017)

Revisor’s notes. —

The contingent amendment to this section made under sec. 33, ch. 122, SLA 1977 never took effect and was repealed by sec. 82, ch. 41, SLA 2009.

This section was reorganized in 1984 to place the defined terms in alphabetical order, in 1990 and 1996 to reflect the deletion of repealed paragraphs, and in 2004, 2009, and 2013 to retain the defined terms in alphabetical order.

Cross references. —

For legislative findings and intent in connection with the 2009 amendments of this section, see § 1, ch. 27, SLA 2009, in the 2009 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For employment security, see 8 AAC 85.

Effect of amendments. —

The first 2009 amendment, effective May 26, 2009, in paragraph (10), added “a federally recognized tribe” following “a political subdivision of the state,”; deleted “after January 1, 1937,” preceding “had one or more individuals”; deleted “after December 31, 1971” in three places; in paragraph (14)(D) [now (15)(D)] added “is operated by a federally recognized tribe or”; added paragraph (22) [now (12)]; renumbered former paragraphs (12) through (21) as (13) through (22) respectively; made stylistic changes.

The second 2009 amendment, effective January 1, 2010, in paragraph (3), added the language beginning “except that, if an individual would not otherwise be eligible...”

The 2013 amendment, effective July 1, 2013, added (23) (now (9)).

The 2017 amendment, effective July 1, 2017, in (21), in the first sentence, deleted “, but not limited to,” following “retraining in schools or classes, including”.

Editor’s notes. —

Concerning the amendment to paragraph (5) made by sec. 6, ch. 51, SLA 2000, sec. 7, ch. 51, SLA 2000 provides as follows: “TRANSITION PROVISION. Notwithstanding the change to the definition of ‘benefit year’ enacted by sec. 6 of this Act, for an insured worker who, on October 6, 2001, has an established current benefit year, the definition of ‘benefit year’ as it existed in AS

23.20.520

(5) on October 6, 2001, applies to that worker’s claim under AS 23.20 until that worker’s current benefit year is completed. If an insured worker’s current benefit year under this section ends on a day other than Sunday, the current benefit year is extended until 11:59 p.m. of the Saturday following that ending week.”

Sec. 23.20.525.
“Employment” defined.

In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires, “employment” means

service performed by an individual for wages or by an officer of a corporation, including service in interstate commerce;

service performed by an individual who, under (8) of this subsection, has the status of an employee;

service performed by an individual other than an individual who is an employee under (1) or (2) of this subsection who performs services for remuneration for any person

as an agent-driver or commission-driver engaged in distributing meat products, vegetable products, fruit products, bakery products, beverages, or laundry or dry-cleaning services, for the individual’s principal; or

as a traveling or city salesman, other than as an agent-driver or commission-driver, engaged upon a full-time basis in the solicitation on behalf of, and the transmission to, the individual’s principal of orders from wholesalers, retailers, contractors, or operators of hotels, restaurants, or other similar establishments for merchandise for resale or supplies for use in their business operations; however, for all purposes of this paragraph, the term “employment” includes services described in this subparagraph and (A) of this paragraph only if

the contract of service contemplates that substantially all of the services are to be performed personally by the individual;

the individual does not have a substantial investment in facilities used in connection with the performance of the services, other than in facilities for transportation; and

the services are not in the nature of a single transaction that is not part of a continuing relationship with the person for whom the services are performed;

service performed by an individual in a calendar quarter in the employ of an organization exempt from income tax under 26 U.S.C. 501(a) (Internal Revenue Code), other than an organization described in 26 U.S.C. 401(a), or under 26 U.S.C. 521, if the remuneration for the service is $250 or more; notwithstanding the provisions of this paragraph, services performed by an individual in the employ of a religious, charitable, educational, or other organization described in 26 U.S.C. 501(c)(3) (Internal Revenue Code) that is exempt from income tax under 26 U.S.C. 501(a), constitutes employment for the purposes of this chapter even though remuneration for the services is less than $250 in a calendar quarter, but only if the organization had four or more individuals in employment for some portion of a day in each of 20 different weeks, whether or not the weeks were consecutive, within either the current or preceding calendar year, regardless of whether the individuals were employed at the same moment of time;

service of an individual who is a citizen of the United States, performed outside the United States, except in Canada, in the employ of an American employer, or of this state or of any of its instrumentalities or any of its political subdivisions, other than service that is considered “employment” under the provisions of (9) or (10) of this subsection or the parallel provisions of the law of another state, if

the employer’s principal place of business in the United States is located in this state; or

the employer has no place of business in the United States, but

the employer is an individual who is a resident of this state; or

the employer is a corporation that is organized under the laws of this state; or

the employer is a partnership or a trust and the number of the partners or trustees who are residents of this state is greater than the number who are residents of any one other state; or

none of the criteria in (A) and (B) of this paragraph is met but the employer has elected coverage in this state or, the employer having failed to elect coverage in any state, the individual has filed a claim for benefits, based on service described in this paragraph, under the law of this state;

notwithstanding the provisions of (9) of this subsection, all service performed by an officer or member of the crew of an American vessel or in connection with the vessel, if the operating office, from which the operations of vessels operating on navigable waters inside, or inside and outside the United States are ordinarily and regularly supervised, managed, directed, and controlled, is inside this state;

notwithstanding any other provisions of this section, service with respect to which tax is required to be paid under any federal law imposing a tax against which credit may be taken for contributions required to be paid into a state unemployment fund or which as a condition for full tax credit against the tax imposed by the Federal Unemployment Tax Act is required to be covered under this chapter;

service performed by an individual whether or not the common-law relationship of master and servant exists, unless and until it is shown to the satisfaction of the department that

the individual has been and will continue to be free from control and direction in connection with the performance of the service, both under the individual’s contract for the performance of service and in fact;

the service is performed either outside the usual course of the business for which the service is performed or is performed outside of all the places of business of the enterprise for which the service is performed; and

the individual is customarily engaged in an independently established trade, occupation, profession, or business of the same nature as that involved in the service performed;

an individual’s entire service performed inside or both inside and outside this state if the service is localized in this state; service is considered to be localized inside a state or territory if

the service is performed entirely inside the state or territory; or

the service is performed both inside and outside the state or territory but the service performed outside the state or territory is incidental to the individual’s service inside the state or territory; for example, where it is temporary or transitory in nature or consists of isolated transactions;

an individual’s entire service performed inside or both inside and outside this state if the service is not localized in a state or territory but some of the service is performed in this state and

the individual’s base of operations is in this state;

if there is no base of operations, then the place from which the service is directed or controlled is in this state; or

the individual’s base of operations or place from which the service is directed or controlled is not in a state or territory in which some part of the service is performed, but the individual’s residence is in this state;

service covered by an election under AS

23.20.325

, and service covered by an election approved by the commissioner in accordance with an arrangement under AS

23.20.090(a)

during the effective period of the election;

service in the employ of this state or any of its instrumentalities or any political subdivision of this state or any of its instrumentalities or any instrumentality of any of the foregoing and one or more other states or political subdivisions, or in the employ of a federally recognized tribe, if that service is excluded from “employment” under 26 U.S.C. 3306(c)(7) (Federal Unemployment Tax Act, Internal Revenue Code) and is not excluded from “employment” under AS

23.20.526(d)

;

domestic services for an employer who paid wages of $1,000 or more in any calendar quarter in the current or preceding calendar year for those services;

service by an individual in agricultural labor when that service is performed for a person who

during any calendar quarter in either the current or the preceding year, paid remuneration in cash of $20,000 or more to individuals employed in agricultural labor; or

employed in agricultural labor 10 or more individuals for some portion of the day in each of at least 20 different calendar weeks in either the current or the preceding calendar year, whether or not the weeks were consecutive, and regardless of whether the individuals were employed at the same moment of time;

for the purposes of this paragraph, any individual who is a member of a crew furnished by a crew leader to perform service in agricultural labor for any other person shall be treated as an employee of that crew leader

if that crew leader holds a valid certificate of registration under the Farm Labor Contractor Registration Act of 1963, or substantially all the members of that crew operate or maintain tractors, mechanized harvesting or cropdusting equipment, or any other mechanized equipment, which is provided by that crew leader; and

if that individual is not an employee of that other person within the meaning of (8) of this subsection;

for the purposes of this paragraph, in the case of an individual who is furnished by a crew leader to perform service in agricultural labor for any other person and who is not treated as an employee of that crew leader under (C) of this paragraph,

that other person and not the crew leader shall be treated as the employer of that individual; and

that other person shall be treated as having paid cash remuneration to that individual in an amount equal to the amount of cash remuneration paid to that individual by the crew leader, either on behalf of the crew leader or on behalf of that other person, for the service in agricultural labor performed for that other person;

for the purposes of this paragraph, the term “crew leader” means an individual who

furnishes individuals to perform service in agricultural labor for any other person;

pays, either on behalf of the crew leader or on behalf of that other person, the individuals furnished by the crew leader for the service in agricultural labor performed by the individuals; and

has not entered into a written agreement with that farm operator under which the agricultural worker is designated as an employee of that farm operator.

In (a)(5) of this section, “American employer” means a person who is

an individual who is a resident of the United States;

a partnership if two-thirds or more of the partners are residents of the United States;

a trust, if all of the trustees are residents of the United States; or

a corporation organized under the laws of the United States or of any state.

History.

(§§ 214-216 ch 5 ESLA 1955; § 217 ch 5 ESLA 1955; §§ 218-220 ch 5 ESLA 1955; §§ 220.1, 220.2 ch 5 ESLA 1955, added by §§ 2, 3 ch 169 SLA 1957; § 220.3 ch 5 ESLA 1955, added by § 1 ch 108 SLA 1961; § 221 ch 5 ESLA 1955; § 222 ch 5 ESLA 1955; §§ 223, 224 ch 5 ESLA 1955; §§ 226, 227 ch 5 ESLA 1955; § 228 ch 5 ESLA 1955; §§ 229 — 234 ch 5 ESLA 1955; § 234.1 ch 5 ESLA 1955, added by § 1 ch 46 SLA 1959; § 234.2 ch 5 ESLA 1955, added by § 2 ch 60 SLA 1960; am § 4 ch 169 SLA 1957; am § 1 ch 60 SLA 1960; am § 1 ch 87 SLA 1962; am § 1 ch 22 SLA 1967; am § 14 ch 106 SLA 1971; am §§ 15 — 18 ch 122 SLA 1977; am §§ 75, 76 ch 9 SLA 1980; am § 17 ch 27 SLA 2009; am § 38 ch 41 SLA 2009)

Revisor’s notes. —

The contingent amendment to this section made under sec. 33, ch. 122, SLA 1977 never took effect and was repealed by sec. 82, ch. 41, SLA 2009.

Cross references. —

For legislative findings and intent in connection with the amendment of (a)(12) of this section by § 17, ch. 27, SLA 2009, see § 1, ch. 27, SLA 2009, in the 2009 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The first 2009 amendment, effective June 21, 2009, in (a)(2), substituted “(8)” for “(10)” preceding “of this section”; in (a)(3)(B), deleted “, performed after December 31, 1979,” preceding “only if”; deleted (a)(4), relating to service performed after December 31, 1971 through December 31, 1977 by someone employed by the state in a hospital or institution of higher education; deleted (a)(5), relating to service performed before January 1, 1978 by an employee of a political subdivision of the state or similar; redesignated former (a)(6) through (a)(16) as (a)(4) through (a)(14) respectively; in (a)(4), deleted “after June 30, 1962” following “in a calendar quarter”, and “after December 31, 1971,” following “services performed”; in (a)(5), deleted “after December 31, 1971” following “except in Canada,” and substituted “(9) or (10)” for “(11) or (12)” following “under the provisions of”; in (a)(6), substituted “(9)” for “(11)” following “notwithstanding the provisions of”; in (a)(12), deleted “performed after December 31, 1977,” following “service”; in (a)(13), deleted “performed after December 31, 1977” following “domestic services”; in the introductory language of (a)(14), deleted “performed after December 31, 1977” following “service”; in (a)(14)(C)(ii), substituted “(8)” for “(10)” following “within the meaning of”; in (b), in the lead-in language, substituted “In (a)(5)” for “In (a)(7)”; made stylistic changes throughout the section.

The second 2009 amendment, effective May 26, 2009, in paragraph (a)(14) [now (a)(12)], deleted “after December 31, 1977” following “service performed”; added “or in the employ of a federally recognized tribe,” following “other states or political subdivisions,”; substituted “AS

23.20.526(d)

” for “AS

23.20.526(d)(8)

”.